California statutes. Civil Code
(2) Except as provided in subdivision (f), a person who operates or uses a sport shooting range or law enforcement training range is not subject to an action for nuisance, and a court shall not enjoin the use or operation of a range, on the basis of noise or noise pollution if the range is in compliance with any noise control laws or ordinances that applied to the range and its operation at the time construction or operation of the range was approved by a local public entity having jurisdiction in the matter, or if there were no such laws or ordinances that applied to the range and its operation at that time.

(3) Rules or regulations adopted by any state department or agency for limiting levels of noise in terms of decibel level which may occur in the
 outdoor atmosphere shall not apply to a sport shooting range exempted from liability under this section.

(c) A person who acquires title to or who owns real property adversely affected by the use of property with a permanently located and improved sport shooting range may not maintain a nuisance action with respect to noise or noise pollution against the person who owns the range to restrain, enjoin, or impede the use of the range where there has been no substantial change in the nature or use of the range. This section does not prohibit actions for negligence or recklessness in the operation of the range or by a person using the range.

(d) A sport shooting range that is in operation and not in violation of existing law at the time of the enactment of an ordinance described in subdivision (b) shall be permitted to continue in operation even if the operation of the sport shooting
 range at a later date does not conform to a new ordinance or an amendment to an existing ordinance if there has been no substantial change in the nature or use of the range. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of a local agency to enforce any term of a conditional use permit.

(e) Except as otherwise provided in this section, this section does not prohibit a local public entity having jurisdiction in the matter from regulating the location and construction of a sport shooting range after the effective date of this section.

(f) This section does not prohibit a local public entity having jurisdiction in the matter from requiring that noise levels at the nearest residential property line to a range not exceed the level of normal city street noise which shall not be more than 60 decibels for nighttime shooting. The subdivision does not abrogate any
 existing local standards for nighttime shooting. The operator of a sport shooting range shall not unreasonably refuse to use trees, shrubs, or barriers, when appropriate, to mitigate the noise generated by nighttime shooting. For the purpose of this section, a reasonable effort to mitigate is an action that can be accomplished in a manner and at a cost that does not impose an unreasonable financial burden upon the operator of the range.

(g) This section does not apply to indoor shooting ranges.

(h) This section does not apply to a range in existence prior to January 1, 1998, that is operated for law enforcement training purposes by a county of the sixth class if the range is located without the boundaries of that county and within the boundaries of another county. This subdivision shall become operative on July 1, 1999.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 141, Sec. 1.   Effective July 13, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

3482.5.

(a) (1) No agricultural activity, operation, or facility, or appurtenances thereof, conducted or maintained for commercial purposes, and in a manner consistent with proper and accepted customs and standards, as established and followed by similar agricultural operations in the same locality, shall be or become a nuisance, private or public, due to any changed condition in or about the locality, after it has been in operation for more than three years if it was not a nuisance at the time it began. 

(2) No activity of a district agricultural association that is operated in compliance with Division 3 (commencing with Section 3001) of the Food and Agricultural Code, shall be or become a private or public nuisance due to any changed condition in or about the locality, after it has been in operation for more than three years if it was not a nuisance at the time it began. This paragraph shall not apply to any activities of the 52nd District Agricultural Association that are conducted on the grounds of the California Exposition and State Fair, nor to any public nuisance action brought by a city, county, or city and county alleging that the activities, operations, or conditions of a district agricultural association have substantially changed after more than three years from the time that the activities, operations, or conditions began.

(b) Paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall not
 apply if the agricultural activity, operation, or facility, or appurtenances thereof obstruct the free passage or use, in the customary manner, of any navigable lake, river, bay, stream, canal, or basin, or any public park, square, street, or highway. 

(c) Paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall not invalidate any provision contained in the Health and Safety Code, Fish and Game Code, Food and Agricultural Code, or Division 7 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Water Code, if the agricultural activity, operation, or facility, or appurtenances thereof constitute a nuisance, public or private, as specifically defined or described in any of those provisions. 

(d) This section shall prevail over any contrary provision of any ordinance or regulation of any city, county, city and county, or other political subdivision of the state. However, nothing in this section shall preclude a
 city, county, city and county, or other political subdivision of this state, acting within its constitutional or statutory authority and not in conflict with other provisions of state law, from adopting an ordinance that allows notification to a prospective homeowner that the dwelling is in close proximity to an agricultural activity, operation, facility, or appurtenances thereof and is subject to the provisions of this section consistent with Section 1102.6a.

(e) For purposes of this section, the term “agricultural activity, operation, or facility, or appurtenances thereof” shall include, but not be limited to, the cultivation and tillage of the soil, dairying, the production, cultivation, growing, and harvesting of any agricultural commodity including timber, viticulture, apiculture, or horticulture, the raising of livestock, fur bearing animals, fish, or poultry, and any practices performed by a farmer or on a farm as incident to or in
 conjunction with those farming operations, including preparation for market, delivery to storage or to market, or delivery to carriers for transportation to market.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 97, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

3482.6.

(a) No agricultural processing activity, operation, facility, or appurtenances thereof, conducted or maintained for commercial purposes, and in a manner consistent with proper and accepted customs and standards, shall be or become a nuisance, private or public, due to any changed condition in or about the locality, after it has been in continuous operation for more than three years if it was not a nuisance at the time it began.

(b) If an agricultural processing activity,
 operation, facility, or appurtenances thereof substantially increases its activities or operations after January 1, 1993, then a public or private nuisance action may be brought with respect to those increases in activities or operations that have a significant effect on the environment. For increases in activities or operations that have been in effect more than three years, there is a rebuttable presumption affecting the burden of producing evidence that the increase was not substantial.

(c) This section does not supersede any other provision of law, except other provisions of this part, if the agricultural processing activity, operation, facility, or appurtenances thereof, constitute a nuisance, public or private, as specifically defined or described in the provision.

(d) This section prevails over any contrary provision of any ordinance or regulation of any city, county, city
 and county, or other political subdivision of the state, except regulations adopted pursuant to Section 41700 of the Health and Safety Code as applied to agricultural processing activities, operations, facilities, or appurtenances thereof that are surrounded by housing or commercial development on January 1, 1993. However, nothing in this section precludes a city, county, city and county, or other political subdivision of this state, acting within its constitutional or statutory authority and not in conflict with other provisions of state law, from adopting an ordinance that allows notification to a prospective homeowner that the dwelling is in close proximity to an agricultural processing activity, operation, facility, or appurtenances thereof and is subject to provisions of this section consistent with Section 1102.6a.

(e) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Agricultural processing activity, operation, facility, or appurtenances thereof” includes, but is not limited to rendering plants licensed pursuant to Section 19300 of the Food and Agricultural Code and collection centers licensed pursuant to Section 19300.5 of the Food and Agricultural Code, the canning or freezing of agricultural products, the processing of dairy products, the production and bottling of beer and wine, the processing of meat and egg products, the drying of fruits and grains, the packing and cooling of fruits and vegetables, and the storage or warehousing of any agricultural products, and includes processing for wholesale or retail markets of agricultural products.

(2) “Continuous operation” means at least 30 days of agricultural processing operations per year.

(3) “Proper and accepted customs and standards” means the compliance with all
 applicable state and federal statutes and regulations governing the operation of the agricultural processing activity, operation, facility, or appurtenances thereof with respect to the condition or effect alleged to be a nuisance.

(f) This section does not apply to any litigation pending or cause of action accruing prior to January 1, 1993.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 329, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

3482.8.

Any building or property used for the purpose of willfully conducting dogfighting in violation of Section 597.5 of the Penal Code or cockfighting in violation of subdivision (b) of Section 597b of the Penal Code is a public nuisance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 128, Sec. 1.   (SB 426)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

3483.

Every successive owner of property who neglects to abate a continuing nuisance upon, or in the use of, such property, created by a former owner, is liable therefor in the same manner as the one who first created it.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3484.

The abatement of a nuisance does not prejudice the right of any person to recover damages for its past existence.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3486.

(a) To abate the nuisance caused by illegal conduct involving a controlled substance purpose on real property, the city prosecutor or city attorney may file, in the name of the people, an action for unlawful detainer against any person who is in violation of the nuisance or illegal purpose
 provisions of subdivision 4 of Section 1161 of the Code of Civil Procedure, with respect to that controlled substance purpose. In filing this action, which shall be based upon an arrest report by a law enforcement agency, reporting an offense committed on the property and documented by the observations of a police officer, the city prosecutor or city attorney shall use the procedures set forth in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1159) of Title 3 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that in cases filed under this section, the following also shall apply:

(1) (A) Prior to filing an action pursuant to this section, the city prosecutor or city attorney shall give 30 calendar days’ written notice to the owner, requiring the owner to file an action for the removal of the person who is in violation of the nuisance or illegal purpose provisions of subdivision 4 of Section 1161 of the Code of Civil Procedure with
 respect to a controlled substance purpose.

(B) This notice shall include sufficient documentation establishing a violation of the nuisance or illegal purpose provisions of subdivision 4 of Section 1161 of the Code of Civil Procedure and an advisement to the owner of the assignment provision contained in subparagraph (D). The notice shall be served upon the owner and the tenant in accordance with subdivision (e).

(C) The notice to the tenant shall, in at least 14-point bold type, meet the following requirements:

(i) The notice shall contain the following language:

 

“(Date)

 

(Name of tenant)

(Address of tenant)

 

Re: Civil Code Section 3486

 

Dear (name of tenant):

 

This letter is to inform you that an eviction action may soon be filed in court against you for suspected drug activity. According to state law, Civil Code Section 3486 provides for eviction of persons engaging in such conduct, as described below.

 

(Name of police department) records indicate that you, (name of arrestee), were arrested on (date) for violations of (list violations) on (address of property).

 

A letter has been sent to the property owner(s) advising of your arrest and the requirements of state law, as well as the landlord’s option to assign the unlawful detainer action to the (name of city attorney or prosecutor’s office).

 

A list of legal assistance providers is provided below. Please note, this list is not exclusive and is provided for your information only; the (name of city attorney or prosecutor’s office) does not endorse or recommend any of the listed agencies.

 

Sincerely,

 

(Name of deputy city attorney or city prosecutor)

Deputy City (Attorney or Prosecutor)

 

Notice to Tenant: This notice is not a notice of eviction. You should call (name of the city attorney or prosecutor pursuing the action) at (telephone number) or a legal assistance provider to stop the eviction action if any of the following is applicable:

(1) You are not the person named in this notice.

(2) The person named in the notice does not live with you.

(3) The person named in the notice has permanently moved.

(4) You do not know the person named in the notice.

(5) You want to request that only the person involved in the nuisance be evicted, allowing the other residents to
 stay.

(6) You have any other legal defense or legal reason to stop the eviction action.

A list of legal assistance providers is attached to this notice. Some provide free legal assistance if you are eligible.”

 

(ii) The notice shall be provided to the tenant in English and, as translated, in all of the languages identified in subdivision (a) of Section 1632 of the Civil Code.

(D) The owner shall, within 30 calendar days of the mailing of the written notice, either provide the city prosecutor or city attorney with all relevant information pertaining to the unlawful detainer case, or provide a written explanation setting forth any safety-related reasons for noncompliance, and an assignment to the city prosecutor
 or city attorney of the right to bring an unlawful detainer action against the tenant.

(E) The assignment shall be on a form provided by the city prosecutor or city attorney and may contain a provision for costs of investigation, discovery, and reasonable attorney’s fees, in an amount not to exceed six hundred dollars ($600). An owner shall only be required to pay the costs or fees upon acceptance of the assignment and the filing of the action for unlawful detainer by the city prosecutor or city attorney.

(F) If the city prosecutor or city attorney accepts the assignment of the right of the owner to bring the unlawful detainer action, the owner shall retain all other rights and duties, including the handling of the tenant’s personal property, following issuance of the writ of possession and its delivery to and execution by the appropriate agency.

(2) Upon the failure of the owner to file an action pursuant to this section, or to respond to the city prosecutor or city attorney as provided in paragraph (1), or having filed an action, if the owner fails to prosecute it diligently and in good faith, the city prosecutor or city attorney may file and prosecute the action, and join the owner as a defendant in the action. This action shall have precedence over any similar proceeding thereafter brought by the owner, or to one previously brought by the owner and not prosecuted diligently and in good faith. Service of the summons and complaint upon the defendant owner shall be in accordance with Sections 415.10, 415.20, 415.30, 415.40, and 415.50 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(3) If a jury or court finds the defendant tenant guilty of unlawful detainer in a case filed pursuant to paragraph (2), the city prosecutor or city attorney may
 be awarded costs, including the costs of investigation and discovery and reasonable attorney’s fees. These costs shall be assessed against the defendant owner, to whom notice was directed pursuant to paragraph (1), and once an abstract of judgment is recorded, it shall constitute a lien on the subject real property.

(4) This section does not prevent a local governing body from adopting and enforcing laws, consistent with this article, relating to drug abatement. If local laws duplicate or supplement this section, this section shall be construed as providing alternative remedies and not preempting the field.

(5) This section does not prevent a tenant from receiving relief against a forfeiture of a lease pursuant to Section 1179 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(b) In any proceeding brought under this section, the court
 may, upon a showing of good cause, issue a partial eviction ordering the removal of any person, including, but not limited to, members of the tenant’s household if the court finds that the person has engaged in the activities described in subdivision (a). Persons removed pursuant to this section may be permanently barred from returning to or reentering any portion of the entire premises. The court may further order as an express condition of the tenancy that the remaining tenants shall not give permission to or invite any person who has been removed pursuant to this subdivision to return to or reenter any portion of the entire premises.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “controlled substance purpose” means the manufacture, cultivation, importation into the state, transportation, possession, possession for sale, sale, furnishing, administering, or giving away, or providing a place to use or fortification of a place involving, cocaine,
 phencyclidine, heroin, methamphetamine, or any other controlled substance, in a violation of subdivision (a) of Section 11350, Section 11351, 11351.5, 11352, or 11359, subdivision (a) of Section 11360, or Section 11366, 11366.6, 11377, 11378, 11378.5, 11379, 11379.5, 11379.6, or 11383 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 68097.2 of the Government Code, a public entity may waive all or part of the costs incurred in furnishing the testimony of a peace officer in an unlawful detainer action brought pursuant to this section.

(e) The notice and documentation described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be given in writing and may be given either by personal delivery or by deposit in the United States mail in a sealed envelope, postage prepaid, addressed to the owner at the address known to the public entity giving the notice, or as shown
 on the last equalized assessment roll, if not known. Separate notice of not less than 30 calendar days and documentation shall be provided to the tenant in accordance with this subdivision. Service by mail shall be deemed to be completed at the time of deposit in the United States mail. Proof of giving the notice may be made by a declaration signed under penalty of perjury by any employee of the public entity which shows service in conformity with this section.

(f) In an unlawful detainer action filed pursuant to this section, the court shall make one of the following orders:

(1) If the grounds for an eviction have not been established pursuant to this section, the court shall dismiss, without prejudice, the unlawful detainer action.

(2) If the grounds for an eviction have been established pursuant to this section,
 the court shall do either of the following:

(A) Order that the tenant and all occupants be immediately evicted from the property.

(B) Dismiss the unlawful detainer action with or without prejudice or stay execution of an eviction order for a reasonable length of time if the tenant establishes by clear and convincing evidence that the immediate eviction would pose an extreme hardship to the tenant and that this hardship outweighs the health, safety, or welfare of the neighbors or surrounding community. However, the court shall not find an extreme hardship solely on the basis of an economic hardship or the financial inability of the tenant to pay for and secure other housing or lodging accommodations.

(3) If the grounds for a partial eviction have been established pursuant to subdivision (b), the court shall order that
 those persons be immediately removed and barred from the property, but the court shall not order the tenancy be terminated.

(g) This section applies only in the County of Los Angeles to a court having jurisdiction over unlawful detainer cases involving real property situated in the City of Los Angeles.

(h) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2014, only if the City of Los Angeles has regularly reported to the California Research Bureau as required by this section as it read during the period from January 1, 2010, to January 1, 2014, inclusive. For purposes of this section, the City of Los Angeles shall be deemed to have complied with this reporting requirement if the 2013 report to the Legislature by the California Research Bureau indicates that the City of Los Angeles has regularly reported to the bureau.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 33.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 2. PUBLIC NUISANCES [3490. - 3496.]

3490.

No lapse of time can legalize a public nuisance, amounting to an actual obstruction of public right.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3491.

The remedies against a public nuisance are:

1. Indictment or information;

2. A civil action; or,

3. Abatement.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1880, Ch. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

3492.

The remedy by indictment or information is regulated by the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1880, Ch. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

3493.

A private person may maintain an action for a public nuisance, if it is specially injurious to himself, but not otherwise.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3494.

A public nuisance may be abated by any public body or officer authorized thereto by law.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3494.5.

(a) (1) A property owner who voluntarily participates in a lead paint abatement program, and all public entities, shall be immune from liability in any lawsuit where a responsible party seeks to recover any cost associated with a lead paint abatement program from a property owner or public entity.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, participation in a lead paint abatement program may be as limited as submission of an application to a lead paint abatement program or as extensive as completion of all activities conducted pursuant to a lead paint abatement program.

(b) (1) A property owner’s participation in a lead paint abatement program shall not be evidence that the participating property is any of the following:

(A) A nuisance.

(B) Substandard under Section 17920.3 of the Health and Safety Code or is in violation of Section 17920.10 of the Health and Safety Code, to the extent that those sections apply to lead-based paint or other substandard conditions controlled utilizing program funds.

(C) Untenantable under Section 1941.1 of the Civil Code, as that section applies to lead-based paint or other
 conditions controlled utilizing program funds.

(2) For the purposes of this subdivision, “participation in a lead paint abatement program” means that a property has been voluntarily enrolled in a lead paint abatement program, qualifies for inspection and services, is deemed to contain actionable lead-based paint, and has been satisfactorily abated, is in the process of being satisfactorily abated, or is awaiting abatement under the lead paint abatement program.

(c) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Lead paint abatement program” means a program that satisfies both of the following:

(A) The program is created to abate lead-based paint.

(B) The program is created as a result of a judgment or settlement in any public nuisance or similar litigation.

(2) “Property owner” means the property owner as well as all agents or employees thereof acting within the course and scope of their agency or employment.

(3) “Public entities” includes the state, the Regents of the University of California, the Trustees of the California State University, a county, city, district, public authority, public agency, and any other political subdivision or public corporation in the state, including any employees or agents thereof acting within the course and scope of their employment or agency.

(4) “Responsible party” means
 a private party legally responsible for the inspection costs, abatement costs, or any other costs associated with a lead paint abatement program.

(d) This section shall not alter existing obligations on homeowners to maintain their property under applicable law or otherwise limit a tenant’s legal remedies for addressing the presence of lead paint on a dwelling.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 171, Sec. 1.   (AB 206)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3495.

Any person may abate a public nuisance which is specially injurious to him by removing, or, if necessary, destroying the thing which constitutes the same, without committing a breach of the peace, or doing unnecessary injury.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3496.

In any of the following described cases, the court may award costs, including the costs of investigation and discovery, and reasonable attorney’s fees, which are not compensated for pursuant to some other provision of law, to the prevailing party:

(a) In any case in which a governmental agency seeks to enjoin the sale, distribution, or public exhibition, for
 commercial consideration, of obscene matter, as defined in Section 311 of the Penal Code.

(b) In any case in which a governmental agency seeks to enjoin the use of a building or place for the purpose of illegal gambling, lewdness, assignation, human trafficking, or prostitution; or any case in which a governmental agency seeks to enjoin acts of illegal gambling, lewdness, assignation, human trafficking, or prostitution in or upon a building or place, as authorized in Article 2 (commencing with Section 11225) of Chapter 3 of Title 1 of Part 4 of the Penal Code.

(c) In any case in which a governmental agency seeks to enjoin the use of a building or place, or seeks to enjoin in or upon any building or place the unlawful sale, manufacture, service, storage, or keeping or giving away of any controlled substance, as authorized in Article 3 (commencing with Section 11570) of Chapter 10
 of Division 10 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) In any case in which a governmental agency seeks to enjoin the unlawful sale, service, storage, or keeping or giving away of alcoholic liquor, as authorized in Article 1 (commencing with Section 11200) of Chapter 3 of Title 1 of Part 4 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 254, Sec. 1.   (AB 2212)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 3. PRIVATE NUISANCES [3501. - 3503.]

3501.

The remedies against a private nuisance are:

1. A civil action; or,

2. Abatement.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3502.

A person injured by a private nuisance may abate it by removing, or, if necessary, destroying the thing which constitutes the nuisance, without committing a breach of the peace, or doing unnecessary injury.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3503.

Where a private nuisance results from a mere omission of the wrongdoer, and cannot be abated without entering upon his land, reasonable notice must be given to him before entering to abate it.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 4. MOTION PICTURES [3504. - 3508.2.]

3504.

As used in this title:

(a) “Animal” means any amphibian, bird, mammal or reptile. It does not include any fish or insect.

(b) “Motion picture” means any motion picture, regardless of length or content, which is exhibited in a motion picture theater to paying customers, or is exhibited on television to paying customers or under the sponsorship of a paying advertiser. It shall not include motion pictures made for scientific, research,
 or educational purposes, or motion pictures exhibited as home movies, or amateur films, which are shown free or at cost to friends, neighbors or civic groups. 

(c) “Person” means individuals, corporations, associations, partnerships, limited liability companies, trustees, lessees, agents and assignees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 56.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3505.

(a) The exhibition of any motion picture, if any intentional killing of, or cruelty to, a human being or an animal is shown in the motion picture and such intentional killing of, or cruelty to, a human being or an animal actually occurred in the production of the motion picture for the purpose of such production, is a nuisance, which shall be enjoined, abated, and prevented.

(b) As used in this section, “killing” and “cruelty” mean conduct which both (1) results in the death or the infliction of any physical injury or wound, including, but not limited to, any
 temporary or permanent physical harm resulting from the administration of any drug or chemical, and (2) is patently offensive to the average person, applying contemporary statewide community standards. It does not include conduct committed against a human being to which the human being has given his or her consent. In determining whether conduct is patently offensive, the trier of fact may consider any or all of the following: (i) the degree or extent of the physical injury inflicted, (ii) the manner in which the injury is inflicted, (iii) the extent to which the injuring or wounding or acts resulting therein are depicted on the screen, (iv) the number of instances of infliction of injury, wound or harm occurring in the making of the motion picture, and (v) whether such conduct is lawful or unlawful under any provision of law other than this title.

(c) For the purposes of this section, it shall not be a requirement that the entire motion picture and all of the conduct resulting therein be taken into account in determining whether a nuisance exists, and to this end, the Legislature finds and declares that any specific conduct which intentionally results in the killing of, or cruelty to, an animal or a human being in the making of a motion picture is unnecessary and is a nuisance, and that if a motion picture cannot be completed in the absence of such conduct, it is, therefore, a nuisance in its entirety.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1152.)
-------------------------------------------

3506.

Whenever there is reasonable cause to believe that a nuisance as defined in this title is kept, maintained or is in existence in any county, the district attorney or the Attorney General, in the name of the people of the State of California, shall, on a proper showing, commence an action in equity to abate and prevent the nuisance and to perpetually enjoin the person conducting or maintaining it, and the owner, lessee or agent of the building, or place, in or upon which the nuisance exists, from maintaining or permitting it. As used herein, a proper showing to commence an action under this title must be based upon evidence independent of the motion picture itself that
 intentional killing of, or cruelty to, a human being or an animal actually occurred in the production of the motion picture for the purpose of such production.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1152.)
-------------------------------------------

3507.

Whenever an action is initiated under this title to abate an alleged nuisance, an adversary trial on the merits shall be held pursuant to Section 3507.2. If the court finds that the exhibition of the particular motion picture constitutes a nuisance, it shall issue a permanent injunction to abate and prevent the continuance or recurrence of such nuisance. No temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction shall be granted in such an action. An appeal may be taken from an order issuing a permanent injunction, and any injunction issued pursuant to this title by the trial court may be stayed by such court pending the outcome of such appeal. No appeal may be taken from a
 ruling by the trial court denying an injunction requested under this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1152.)
-------------------------------------------

3507.1.

In actions brought under this title, the motion picture shall be admissible into evidence. The burden of proof that the exhibition of the particular motion picture constitutes a nuisance shall be met by the district attorney or Attorney General only when clear and convincing evidence, independent of the motion picture itself, is provided that the acts alleged actually occurred in the production of the motion picture.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1152.)
-------------------------------------------

3507.2.

Actions brought under this title shall be brought as promptly as possible. Such actions shall have precedence over all actions, excepting criminal proceedings and election contests. It is also the intent of the Legislature that actions commenced under this title be adjudicated in the most speedy and expeditious manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1152.)
-------------------------------------------

3507.3.

Any violation or disobedience of an injunction or order expressly provided for by this title is punishable as a contempt of court by a fine of not less than two hundred dollars ($200) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1152.)
-------------------------------------------

3507.4.

The distributor who furnished a motion picture to a person who is made a defendant in an action under this title, and the producer of a motion picture which is the subject of this title shall be jointly and severally liable, upon proof and after an opportunity to appear and interpose any appropriate defenses, to such person and the exhibitor for damages, including loss of profits, attorney’s fees, and other costs of defending such action. Such distributor and such producer shall actively assist in such defense to the extent that such person possesses information necessary to such defense concerning the production of the motion picture which is not otherwise available to
 the defendant. The exhibitor shall not be liable upon any portion of any contract made on or after January 1, 1979, which requires the exhibition or advertisement of a motion picture subject to this title on or after the date of the filing of any action under this title, if the motion picture by final decision of a court is determined to be a nuisance under this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1152.)
-------------------------------------------

3508.

(a) This title shall not apply to any of the following:

(1) The exhibition of any motion picture, such as a newsreel or documentary, involving acts of killing or cruelty which were not intentionally committed for the purpose of producing the motion picture.

(2) Any motion picture made, in whole or in part, prior to January 1, 1979.

(3) Any motion picture all or part of which has been edited or remade so that any previous conduct which constituted a nuisance
 under this title no longer appears.

(4) The taking of any animal as permitted by any provision of the Fish and Game Code or pursuant thereto in accordance with regulations adopted by the Fish and Game Commission unless the time, place, or manner of such taking violates any provision of law except this title. This title shall apply to any other animal whether or not the time, place, or manner of the taking is prohibited by any laws other than this title, however, this title shall not apply to the taking of any animal authorized by law in any other jurisdiction unless the time, place or manner of such taking is prohibited by law or regulation.

(5) A motion picture which includes scenes of killing or cruelty to animals if the acts constituting the killing or cruelty were authorized by the laws governing such acts in the jurisdiction where the scenes were filmed.

(6) Any motion picture which bears within its contents a statement from the producer of the motion picture that all scenes depicting animals were filmed without the intentional killing of, or cruelty to an animal or that any killing or cruelty to an animal was authorized by the laws of the jurisdiction where the scenes were filmed or that the film is otherwise exempt under this title.

(7) Any motion picture if the exhibitor thereof has a written signed statement, or a copy thereof, from the producer of the motion picture that all scenes depicting animals were filmed without the intentional killing of, or cruelty to an animal or that any killing or cruelty to an animal was authorized by the laws of the jurisdiction where the scenes were filmed or that the film is otherwise exempt under this title.

(b) This title shall
 not apply in any case in which it would conflict with federal supremacy in the field of television broadcasting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1152.)
-------------------------------------------

3508.1.

Any producer who willfully misstates or causes to be misstated any fact contained in a statement under paragraph (6) or (7) of Section 3508 is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1152.)
-------------------------------------------

3508.2.

If any provision of this title or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this title which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this title are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1152.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. MAXIMS OF JURISPRUDENCE [3509. - 3548.]

3509.
